Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.140

Escheat for want of heirs.

Whenever any person dies, whether a resident of this state or not, leaving property subject to the jurisdiction of this state and without being survived by any person entitled to the same under the laws of this state, such property shall be designated escheat property and shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 11.08.140 through 11.08.280.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.08.140. Prior: 1955 c 254 s 2.]